Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska70-604.09
District; conduct business in other states; limitations.

A public power district may exercise its powers and engage in business either in the State of Nebraska or in any other state subject to any limitations in the petition for its creation and to the laws of such other state. In order to exercise its powers or engage in business in another state, a public power district shall have power and be authorized to comply with the laws of that state.

Laws 1971, LB 276, § 1.